Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Cross references.

- Restrictions on location of and screening and fencing requirements for junkyards,

§

32-6-240

et seq.

Law reviews.

-
For note on solid waste disposal,
flow control ordinances, and regulations, see 32 Ga. L. Rev. 1227 (1998).

12-8-1. Notice of denial of individual sewage disposal permits; duty to consider denial in ad valorem tax determinations.

As used in this Code section, the term "individual sewage disposal system" means a sewage disposal system, other than a public or community sewage disposal system, serving a single building, residence, or other facility designed or used for human occupancy or congregation and shall include septic tank systems and pit privies.

In any case in which an application for an individual sewage disposal system permit is denied, it shall be the duty of the Department of Public Health or the county board of health denying such permit to notify the applicant, in writing, of such denial. Such notices shall be mailed by first-class mail within 15 days of the date on which the application is denied. The notice shall contain the name and address of the applicant, a description of the property involved, the reasons for denial of the permit, and notification that the applicant should contact the county board of tax assessors for ad valorem tax purposes. It shall be the duty of the county board of tax assessors and the county tax appraisal staff of the county in which the property is located to consider the denial of an individual sewage disposal system permit and the reasons for such denial in determining the fair market value of such property for ad valorem tax purposes.

(Code 1933, § 88-310, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1663, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.)

Cross references.

- County ad valorem taxation generally,

§

48-5-220

et seq.

Law reviews.

-
For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

12-8-2. Dumping sanitary sewer, kitchen, or toilet wastes in storm or sanitary sewers prohibited; forfeiture of involved vehicles.

No person, firm, or corporation shall place, dump, dispose of, or cause to be placed, dumped, or disposed of in a public storm or sanitary sewer pipeline or through manholes thereof, or otherwise, any contents or matter of or from any septic tank, waste water holding tank, grease trap, or other container serving the purpose of a septic tank, waste water holding tank, or grease trap, which contents or matter is made up wholly or partly by the sanitary sewer, kitchen, or toilet waste from any residential source or commercial or industrial waste from business processes from any commercial or industrial facility, unless the express written permission of the owner of such public storm or sewer pipeline is first obtained.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any motor vehicle, trailer, and all other property and instruments utilized in the hauling, transporting, dumping, placing, or disposition of any contents or matter in any public sewer in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section are declared to be contraband and shall be subject to forfeiture according to the terms, provisions, conditions, and procedures set out in Chapter 16 of Title 9.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-12/HB 233.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2015, p. 693,

§

4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure."

Law reviews.

-
For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).